Wisconsin, session 2025, SB531.
do enact as follows:SB531,11Section 1. 632.11 of the statutes is created to read:SB531,2,32632.11 Residential contractors and postloss assignment of rights or 3benefits.SB531,2,44(1) In this section:SB531,2,65(a) “Catastrophe” means a natural occurrence that damages or destroys 6residential real estate. “Catastrophe” includes any of the following:SB531,2,771. Earthquake.SB531,2,882. Fire.SB531,2,993. Flood.SB531,2,10104. Hail storm.SB531,2,11115. Tornado.SB531,2,12126. Windstorm.SB531,2,14137. Any naturally occurring weather event for which the governor declares a 14state of emergency under s. 323.10.SB531,2,1715(am) “Postloss assignment” means a written transfer of any claim, right, or 16benefit under a property insurance policy after a covered loss has occurred, 17including a right to payment for repairs or services.SB531,3,618(b) “Residential contractor” means a person who is in the business of 1contracting to repair or replace residential roof systems or to perform any other 2repair, replacement, or reconstruction work to address damage to residential real 3estate caused by a catastrophe or a person who offers to contract with an owner or 4possessor of residential real estate to carry out such work. “Residential contractor” 5includes a person who is in the business of contracting to remove trees, repair trees, 6or provide other related services to address damage caused by a catastrophe.SB531,3,87(c) “Residential real estate” means a new or existing building, including a 8detached garage, constructed for habitation by one to 4 families.SB531,3,109(d) “Roof system” includes roof coverings, roof sheathing, roof 10weatherproofing, and roof insulation.SB531,3,2111(2) (a) No residential contractor may advertise or promise to rebate any 12insurance deductible or any portion thereof as an inducement to the sale of goods or 13services. A promise to rebate any insurance deductible includes granting any 14allowance, offering any discount, waiver, or reduction against the fees to be charged 15for goods or services, or providing or paying any person directly or indirectly 16associated with the residential real estate any form of compensation, except for 17items of nominal value. This paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit a 18residential contractor from displaying a sign or other type of advertisement on a 19person’s premises provided that the person consents to the display and the person 20receives no compensation from the residential contractor for the placement of the 21sign or other type of advertisement.SB531,4,222(b) No residential contractor may represent or negotiate on behalf of, or offer 23or advertise to represent or negotiate on behalf of, an owner or possessor of 24residential real estate for any insurance claim in connection with the repair or 1replacement of roof systems, or the performance of any other exterior repair, 2exterior replacement, or exterior reconstruction work on the residential real estate.SB531,4,63(c) 1. A residential contractor contracting to provide goods or services to 4repair damage resulting from a catastrophe shall provide the person with whom the 5residential contractor is contracting a fully completed duplicate notice in at least 10 6point bold type that contains the following statement:SB531,4,77NOTICE OF CONTRACT OBLIGATIONS AND RIGHTSSB531,4,198You may be responsible for payment to (insert name of residential contractor) 9for the cost of all goods and services provided whether or not you receive payment 10from any property insurance policy with respect to the damage. Pursuant to 11Wisconsin law your contract with (insert name of residential contractor) to provide 12goods and services to repair damage resulting from a naturally occurring 13catastrophe is void and you have no responsibility for payment under the contract if 14(insert name or residential contractor) either advertises or promises to rebate all or 15any portion of your insurance deductible, or represents or offers to represent you, or 16negotiates or offers to negotiate on your behalf, in any interaction with your 17property insurance company regarding any insurance claim relating to the damage 18you have contracted to have repaired. Your signature below acknowledges your 19understanding of these legal obligations and rights.SB531,4,2020.................................................................SB531,4,2121DateSB531,4,2222.................................................................SB531,4,2323SignatureSB531,5,3242. The notice under subd. 1. shall be executed by the person with whom the 1residential contractor is contracting prior to or contemporaneously with entering 2into a contract to provide goods or services to repair damage resulting from a 3catastrophe.SB531,5,64(3) A postloss assignment of rights or benefits under a property insurance 5policy insuring residential real estate by a named insured to a residential 6contractor is subject to all of the following:SB531,5,97(a) The assignment may authorize a residential contractor only to be named 8as a copayee for the payment of benefits under the property insurance policy for 9work performed by the contractor.SB531,5,1010(b) The assignment shall include all of the following:SB531,5,11111. An itemized description of the work to be performed.SB531,5,13122. An itemized description of the materials, labor, and any fees for the work to 13be performed.SB531,5,14143. A total amount to be paid for the work to be performed.SB531,5,1815(c) The assignment shall include a statement that the residential contractor 16has made no assurances that the claimed loss will be fully covered under the 17property insurance policy and shall include the following notice in capitalized 14-18point type:SB531,5,2119YOU ARE AGREEING TO GIVE UP CERTAIN RIGHTS YOU HAVE 20UNDER YOUR PROPERTY INSURANCE POLICY. PLEASE READ AND 21UNDERSTAND THIS DOCUMENT BEFORE SIGNING.SB531,6,422THE ITEMIZED DESCRIPTION AND PRICING OF THE WORK TO BE 23DONE SHOWN IN THIS ASSIGNMENT FORM HAS NOT BEEN AGREED TO 24BY THE INSURER. THE INSURER HAS THE RIGHT TO PAY FOR LOSS 1SUBJECT TO THEIR ASSESSMENT AND ACCORDING TO THE TERMS AND 2CONDITIONS FOR THE INSURANCE POLICY ONLY FOR THE COST TO 3REPAIR OR REPLACE DAMAGED PROPERTY CAUSED BY A COVERED 4PERIL.SB531,6,75(d) The assignment shall include the following notice in capitalized 14-point 6type located in the immediate proximity of the space reserved in the assignment for 7the signature of the named insured:SB531,6,118YOU MAY CANCEL THIS ASSIGNMENT WITHOUT PENALTY WITHIN 9FIVE (5) BUSINESS DAYS FROM THE DATE THAT THE ASSIGNMENT IS 10EXECUTED OR THE DATE ON WHICH YOU RECEIVE A COPY OF THE 11EXECUTED ASSIGNMENT, WHICHEVER IS LATER.SB531,6,1812YOU MUST CANCEL THE ASSIGNMENT IN WRITING AND THE 13CANCELLATION MUST BE DELIVERED TO (name and address of residential 14contractor as provided by the residential contractor). IF MAILED, THE 15CANCELLATION MUST BE POSTMARKED BEFORE THE FIVE (5) BUSINESS 16DAY DEADLINE. IF YOU CANCEL THIS ASSIGNMENT, THE RESIDENTIAL 17CONTRACTOR HAS UP TO TEN (10) BUSINESS DAYS TO RETURN ANY 18PAYMENTS OR DEPOSITS MADE.SB531,6,2119(e) The assignment shall not be construed to impair the interest of a 20mortgagee listed on the declarations page of the property insurance policy that is 21the subject of the assignment.SB531,7,222(f) The assignment shall not be construed to prevent or inhibit an insurer 23from communicating with the named insured or mortgagee listed on the 1declarations page of the property insurance policy that is the subject of the 2assignment.SB531,7,53(g) The residential contractor shall provide a copy of the executed assignment 4to the insurer of the residential real estate within 5 business days following the date 5that the assignment is executed.SB531,7,136(h) The named insured has the right to cancel the assignment for any reason 7within 5 business days following the date that the assignment is executed or the 8date on which the named insured receives a copy of the executed assignment, 9whichever is later. The cancellation must be made in writing. Within 10 business 10days following the date that the named insured cancels the assignment under this 11paragraph, the residential contractor shall tender to the named insured, the land 12owner, or the possessor of the real estate any payments, partial payments, or 13deposits that have been made by the named insured, land owner, or possessor. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb531 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb531 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB531 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB531 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB531: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting